Utah statutes.
62A-4a-402.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "A person responsible for a child's care" means the child's parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child's care, whether in the same home as the child, a relative's home, a group, family, or center day care facility, a foster care home, or a residential institution.

(2)  "Subject" or "subject of the report" means any person reported under this part, including, but not limited to, a child, parent, guardian, or other person responsible for a child's care.



Amended by Chapter 299, 2008 General Session

